Utah statutes.
26-20-9.5.   Civil penalties.

(1)  The culpable mental state required for a civil violation of this chapter is "knowing" or "knowingly" which:

(a)  means that person, with respect to information:

(i)  has actual knowledge of the information;

(ii)  acts in deliberate ignorance of the truth or falsity of the information; or

(iii)  acts in reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the information; and

(b)  does not require a specific intent to defraud.

(2)  Any person who violates this chapter shall, in all cases, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be required to:

(a)  make full and complete restitution to the state of all damages that the state sustains because of the person's violation of this chapter;

(b)  pay to the state its costs of enforcement of this chapter in that case, including the cost of investigators, attorneys, and other public employees, as determined by the state; and

(c)  pay to the state a civil penalty equal to:

(i)  three times the amount of damages that the state sustains because of the person's violation of this chapter; and

(ii)  not less than $5,000 or more than $10,000 for each claim filed or act done in violation of this chapter.

(3)  Any civil penalties assessed under Subsection (2) shall be awarded by the court as part of its judgment in both criminal and civil actions.

(4)  A criminal action need not be brought against a person in order for that person to be civilly liable under this section.

